th: ระบบการสูบลมว่าว: หลายจุด; ไม่ใช้ปั๊ม (ว่าวฟอยล์); ปั๊มจุดเดียว; จุดเดียว; อื่นๆ
en: Kite inflation system: Multi-point; No-pump (foil kite); One-pump; Single-point; Other
hr-HR: Sustav za napuhavanje zmajeva: U više točaka; Bez pumpe (foil zmaj); S jednom pumpom; U jednoj točki; Ostalo
lt-LT: Aitvaro pripūtimo sistema: Kelių taškų; Be pompos (foil tipo jėgos aitvaras); Vieno taško; Vieno taško; Kita
ja: カイトインフレシステム: マルチポイント; ポンプなし (フォイルカイト); ワンポンプ; シングルポイント; その他
bg-BG: Система за надуване на кайт: Многоточкова; Без помпа (фойл кайт); Едноточкова; Едноточкова; Друго
da: System til oppustning af kiten: Flerpunkts; Pumpefri (foil-kite); Enkeltpumpe; Etpunkts; Andet
sk-SK: Systém nafukovania draka: Viacbodový; Bez pumpy (komorový kite); Jednobodový (One-pump); Jednobodový; Iné
zh-TW: 風箏充氣系統: 多點; 免打氣 (軟體風箏); 單幫浦; 單點; 其他
hu: Sárkányfelfújó rendszer: Többpontos; Pumpa nélküli (paplanernyő); Egypumpás; Egypontos; Egyéb
vi: Hệ thống bơm diều: Nhiều điểm; Không bơm (diều foil); Một bơm; Một điểm; Khác
fi: Leijan täyttöjärjestelmä: Monipiste; Ilman pumppua (patjaleija); Yhden pumpun; Yksipiste; Muu
ro-RO: Sistem de umflare a zmeului: Multipunct; Fără pompă (zmeu tip folie); Pompă unică; Un singur punct; Altele
el: Σύστημα φουσκώματος αετού (Kite): Πολλαπλών σημείων; Χωρίς τρόμπα (kite τύπου foil); One-pump; Ενός σημείου; Άλλο
nl: Kite oppompsysteem: Meerpunts; Zonder pomp (foilkite); One-pump; Enkelpunts; Anders
sl-SI: Sistem za napihovanje zmajev: Večtočkovni; Brez tlačilke (zmaj s folijo); Sistem z eno tlačilko; Enotočkovni; Drugo
fr: Système de gonflage du cerf-volant: Multipoint; Sans pompe (aile à caissons); À pompe unique; Monopoint; Autre
pt-PT: Sistema de enchimento do kite: Multiponto; Sem bomba (foil kite); Uma bomba; Ponto único; Outro
pl: System pompowania latawca: Wielopunktowy; Bez pompki (latawiec komorowy); Jednopunktowy (One-pump); Jednopunktowy; Inny
tr: Uçurtma şişirme sistemi: Çok noktalı; Pompasız (folyo uçurtma); Tek pompalı; Tek noktalı; Diğer
nb: Dragens oppblåsingssystem: Flerpunkts; Ingen pumpe (foil-kite); Énpumpe; Enkeltpunkts; Annet
pt-BR: Sistema de inflação do kite: Multiponto; Sem bomba (foil kite); Uma bomba; Ponto único; Outro
es: Sistema de inflado del kite: Multipunto; Sin bomba (cometa foil); Bomba única; Punto único; Otro
zh-CN: 风筝充气系统: 多点; 免充气（翼型风筝）; 单点充气; 单点; 其他
sv: Uppblåsningssystem för drake: Flerpunkts; Utan pump (foil-kite); One-pump; Enkelpunkts; Övrigt
de: Aufblassystem des Kites: Mehrpunkt; Ohne Pumpe (Foil-Kite); One-Pump; Einpunkt; Sonstige
it: Sistema di gonfiaggio dell'aquilone: Multipunto; Senza pompa (foil kite); A pompa singola; Punto singolo; Altro
ru: Система накачивания кайта: Многоточечная; Без насоса (парафойл); One-pump; Одноточечная; Другая
cs: Systém nafukování draků: Vícebodový; Bez pumpy (komorový drak); Systém One-Pump; Jednobodový; Jiné
ko: 연 부풀림 시스템: 멀티포인트; 무펌프(포일 카이트); 원펌프; 싱글포인트; 기타